Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 5.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2929
Members.

In order to commence business, a limited cooperative association shall have two or more patron members, except that a limited cooperative association may have only one member if the member is an entity organized under the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act, the Nonstock Cooperative Marketing Act, or sections 21-1301 to 21-1339.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 29;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 5.

Cooperative corporations, see section 21-1301 et seq.

Cooperative farm land companies, see section 21-1333 et seq.

Nonstock Cooperative Marketing Act, see section 21-1401.